fst/lexc/sgx_inflection.txt
Multichar_Symbols
-1SG.II
-1PL.II
-2SG.II
-2PL.II
-3.II
-3PL.II
-3PL.INDP
=PN
=CN
-SX


LEXICON SeriesII
-1SG.II:^'y	Word ;
-1PL.II:^'m	Word ;
-2SG.II:^n		Word ;
-2PL.II:^si'm	Word ;
-3.II:^t		Word ;
-3PL.II:^diit	Word ;
	AgreeingNClitic ;

LEXICON AgreeingNClitic
[-3.II]=CN:^hl	# ;
[-3.II]=PN:^s	# ;
[-3.II]=PN:^s	DemonstrativeClitic ;

LEXICON PossessiveClitic
-1SG.II:^[i|u]	Word ;
-1PL.II:^sm	Word ;
-2SG.II:^n		Word ;
-2PL.II:^ism	Word ;
-3.II:^t		Word ;

LEXICON SX
-SX:^it		Word ;
-SX:^it		Resemb ;

LEXICON daPlClitic
-3PL.INDP:^da	# ;
